Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska58-617
Application to existing institutional funds.

The Nebraska Uniform Prudent Management of Institutional Funds Act applies to institutional funds existing on or established after September 1, 2007. As applied to institutional funds existing on September 1, 2007, the act governs only decisions made or actions taken on or after that date.

Laws 2007, LB136, § 8.